Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.295

Review of price information by director.

The director shall review the price information required under RCW 32.32.290 in determining whether to give approval to an application for conversion. No representations may be made in any manner that the price information has been approved by the director or that the shares of capital stock sold pursuant to the plan of conversion have been approved or disapproved by the director or that the director has passed upon the accuracy or adequacy of any offering circular covering the shares.

[ 1994 c 92 s 377; 1981 c 85 s 58.]